Illinois, session 104th, HB281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Association Defamation Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (745 ILCS 54/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Interscholastic Association Defamation Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-723, eff. 10-1-09.)